Arkansas statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 4

State Symbols, Motto, Etc.

Preambles.

Acts 1973, No. 49 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the honeybee is a diligent and willing worker and in this respect typifies the outstanding citizens of the State of Arkansas; and

“Whereas, honeybees are extremely productive and demonstrate an unusual degree of conservation in carrying out their highly complicated purpose and duties; and

“Whereas, honeybees are outstanding keepers of their home and are willing to defend their homes against all intruders; and

“Whereas, without honeybees, pollination of our agricultural crops would be severely reduced and the resulting reduction in agricultural production could result in a substantial shortage of food products; and

“Whereas, there has been no official designation of a state insect for the State of Arkansas,

“Now Therefore, … .”

Acts 1985, No. 277 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the fiddle, otherwise known as the violin, is generally accepted as the musical instrument that is most commonly associated with the musical education and entertainment of the pioneer families of Arkansas; and

“Whereas, the fiddle continues as a dominant musical instrument in the culture, education and family entertainment of the people of Arkansas; and

“Whereas, the fiddle has encouraged native craftsmanship and a unique Arkansas philosophy.

“Now Therefore, … .”

Acts 1985, No. 998 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the State of Arkansas has enjoyed the benefits of fresh wholesome milk for decades; and

“Whereas, dairy farming is a very important part of our Arkansas agricultural community; and

“Whereas, the State of Arkansas has relied on its dedicated dairy farmers to supply our citizens with nature's most nearly perfect food; and

“Whereas, the citizens of Arkansas should be encouraged to drink milk every day as a nutritious food.

“Now Therefore, … .”

Acts 1991, No. 93 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, love of state and professions is enhanced by traditions that have become a part of our way of life and the customs of the American people; and

“Whereas, we have distinctive and meaningful symbols of our ideals in our state's flag and in many cultural endeavors, but no official designation of a State Folk Dance; and

“Whereas, the square dance, which was first associated with the American people and recorded in history since 1651, has consistently been the one dance traditionally recognized by the American people as a dignified and enjoyable expression of American folk dancing; and

“Whereas, square dancing is a traditional form of family recreation which symbolizes a basic strength of this country, namely the unity of family; and

“Whereas, square dancing is an activity for young and old, where senior citizens enjoy dance and fellowship and where disabled persons become skilled, happy and “handicapable” dancers; and

“Whereas, square dancing is the American folk dance which is called, cued, or prompted to the dancers, and includes squares, rounds, clogging, contra, line, and heritage dances; and

“Whereas, official recognition of the square dance will enhance the cultural stature of Arkansas both nationally and internationally; and

“Whereas, national and international prestige is the best interest of all Americans; and

“Whereas, it is fitting that the square dance be added to the array of symbols of our state character and pride,

“Now Therefore, … .”

Acts 1997, No. 890 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas a growing number of states of the United States, having significant concerns for soil, have by legislative enactment chosen a locally unique soil series as their official state soil; and

“Whereas, the State of Arkansas has significant concern for its soil resources and takes pride in its designation as the Natural State; and

“Whereas, soils enhance the quality of surface and ground water and serve as the foundation for our bountiful agriculture, our forests and pasturelands, our unique wildlife habitats, our beautiful landscapes, and the homes and communities of our citizens; and

“Whereas, the Stuttgart soil series (member of a soil family of fine, smectitic, thermic Albaquultic Hapludalfs) covers nearly 200,000 acres in Arkansas, is vitally important economically and ecologically to the well being of all Arkansans, and is unique to the State of Arkansas; and”

“Whereas, the State of Arkansas has yet to designate a state soil.”

Acts 2001, No. 476 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, Dutch ovens were used in 1803 when Arkansas was a part of the Louisiana Purchase area; and

“Whereas, Dutch ovens were in use in 1836 when Arkansas became one of the United States of America; and

“Whereas, Dutch ovens have served as cooking vessels and bake kettles on hearths and camping sites of settlers in the State of Arkansas; and

“Whereas, Dutch ovens continue to be used by outdoorsmen and campers at this time;”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1907, No. 395, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1967, No. 128, § 4: Feb. 22, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is presently no officially designated State Gem, State Mineral or State Rock, for the State of Arkansas; that there are many clubs and individuals throughout the United States that collect, trade, and sell official State Gems, Minerals and Rocks, and thus it is essential that the General Assembly immediately designate a State Gem, Mineral and Rock, in order that the various interested clubs and individuals in Arkansas can trade official State Gems, Minerals and Rocks, with like clubs and individuals in other States. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 90, § 3: Feb. 15, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that procedures do not now exist for the recognition and designation of a Poet Laureate for the State of Arkansas, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order to enable the Governor of the State of Arkansas to grant appropriate recognition for outstanding accomplishments in poetry to a deserving and qualified resident of this State by designating a Poet Laureate. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 414, § 3: Mar. 19, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Regular Session of the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly that pride in and respect for the flags of the United States of America and of the State of Arkansas is gained by the honor of civic groups, schools, and organized youth groups obtaining flags that have been flown over the State Capitol Building, and that the furnishing of flags flown over the State Capitol Building to members of the General Assembly will enable the House and Senate members and the Governor to distribute such flags in an appropriate manner to civic groups, schools, and youth organizations in the various communities of this State, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable the Secretary of State to acquire a sufficient supply of such flags to be flown over the State Capitol Building for distribution to the members of the General Assembly and the Governor to accomplish the purposes intended by this Act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 123, § 21: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1993, No. 469, § 5: Mar. 12, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the purple martin is a bird known for its hearty appetite for mosquitoes and other flying insects and is deemed an attractive asset because of its appearance, song, cleanliness, and diet, and that the city of Lake Village in southeastern Arkansas is located along the North-South Flyway where millions of birds migrate annually, and that designating the city of Lake Village as the Southeast Purple Martin Capital of Arkansas will economically benefit the area by attracting tourists to the area and by gaining it recognition as a prime birding hotspot. Therefore, in order to economically aid the city of Lake Village, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 300, § 2: became law without the Governor's signature. Noted Mar. 5, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there currently is an inadequate supply of flags for members of the General Assembly; that the members are receiving requests for flags from schools, community groups, and other constituencies, and are unable to fill those requests; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to alleviate that situation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

1-4-101. State flag.

(a)(1)(A)

The official state flag shall be a rectangle of red on which is placed a large white diamond, bordered by a wide band of blue on which are twenty-five (25) white stars.

(B)

Across the diamond shall be the word “ARKANSAS” and four (4) blue stars, with one (1) star above and three (3) stars below the word “ARKANSAS”.

(C)

The star above the word “ARKANSAS” shall be below the upper corner of the diamond.

(D)

The three (3) stars below the word “ARKANSAS” shall be placed so that one (1) star shall be above the lower corner of the diamond and two (2) stars shall be placed symmetrically, parallel above and to the right and left of the star in the lower corner of the diamond.

(2)

The colors used for the official state flag shall be the same as those used on the United States flag, specifically to include:

(A)

Old Glory Red or its equivalent; and

(B)

Old Glory Blue or its equivalent.

(b)

The three (3) stars so placed are designed to represent the three (3) nations, France, Spain, and the United States, which have successively exercised dominion over Arkansas. These stars also indicate that Arkansas was the third state carved out of the Louisiana Purchase. Of these three (3) stars, the twin stars parallel with each other signify that Arkansas and Michigan are twin states, having been admitted to the Union together on June 15, 1836. The twenty-five (25) white stars on the band of blue show that Arkansas was the twenty-fifth state admitted to the Union. The blue star above the word “ARKANSAS” is to commemorate the Confederate States of America. The diamond signifies that this state is the only diamond-bearing state in the Union.

(c)

An official state flag shall be made in the United States.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 116, § 1; 2011, No. 1205, §§ 1, 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Former §1-4-101, which concerned the state flag, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from the following sources: Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 11, Acts 1913, p. 1508; House Concurrent Resolution No. 4, Acts 1923, p. 815; House Concurrent Resolution No. 11, Acts 1924 (2nd Ex. Sess.), p. 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-107.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted (a)(2); and added (c).

Cross References.

Contempt for or desecration of the Arkansas flag, §5-51-208.

1-4-102. Salute to state flag.

The following is adopted as the official salute to the Arkansas Flag: “I salute the Arkansas Flag with its diamond and stars. We pledge our loyalty to thee.”

History.

House Concurrent Resolution No. 23, Acts 1953, p. 1510; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-108.

1-4-103. Lowering of flags upon death of public officials.

(a)

It shall be the policy of the State of Arkansas to honor and pay tribute to certain public officials by lowering the state flags located on public buildings and other public property to half-mast from the time notice of the official's death is received through the day on which funeral services are conducted for the deceased official.

(b)

This section shall apply with respect to the following officers:

(1)

Current and past members of the United States Congress from the State of Arkansas;

(2)

Current constitutional officers of the State of Arkansas;

(3)

Former Governors of the State of Arkansas;

(4)

Current members of the General Assembly; and

(5)

Current members of the Supreme Court.

(c)

The provisions of this section shall not interfere with or restrict the authority of the Governor to order the state flag lowered to half-staff by executive proclamation at times other than those mentioned in this section.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 534, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-108.1 — 5-108.3.

1-4-104. Distribution of flags.

(a)(1)

The Secretary of State shall obtain a sufficient quantity of flags of the United States and flags of the State of Arkansas in order that the flags that have been flown over the State Capitol Building may be made available to members of the House of Representatives and members of the Senate for distribution in their respective districts and to the Governor for statewide distribution, to:

(A)

Civic groups;

(B)

Schools;

(C)

Organized youth groups; and

(D)

An individual as an award in recognition of the individual's accomplishment.

(2)

The flags described under this section and purchased by the Secretary of State shall be made in the United States.

(b)

A sufficient quantity of flags shall be obtained to permit the Secretary of State to make available for distribution in the manner authorized in this section:

(1)

Thirty (30) Arkansas flags and twenty (20) United States flags per calendar year to each member of the House of Representatives and the Senate;

(2)

One hundred (100) Arkansas flags and one hundred (100) United States flags per calendar year to the office of the Governor;

(3)

One hundred (100) Arkansas flags and one hundred (100) United States flags to the office of the Secretary of State;

(4)

Thirty-five (35) Arkansas flags and thirty-five (35) United States flags to the office of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

(5)

Thirty-five (35) Arkansas flags and thirty-five (35) United States flags to the office of the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

(6)

Twenty-five (25) Arkansas flags and twenty-five (25) United States flags per calendar year to the:

(A)

Lieutenant Governor;

(B)

Treasurer of State;

(C)

Auditor of State; and

(D)

Commissioner of State Lands; and

(7)

Twenty-five (25) United States flags and twenty-five (25) Arkansas flags per calendar year to the Division of Emergency Medical Services of the Department of Health.

(c)

This section supersedes any other law of this state that provides for the Secretary of State to furnish copies of flags for distribution to groups and individuals as described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 414, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-120, 5-121; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 123, § 14; 2003, No. 300, § 1; 2011, No. 1205, § 3; 2013, No. 955, § 1; 2015, No. 1184, § 1; 2019, No. 220, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2011 amendment inserted (a)(2); and substituted “shall” for “is authorized and directed to” in (a)(1).

The 2013 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “Thirty (30)” for “Fifteen (15)” and “twenty (20)” for “ten (10)”; rewrote (b)(2); inserted present (b)(3) through (b)(5); redesignated former (b)(3) as present (b)(6); and rewrote present (b)(6).

The 2015 amendment added “the” at the end of the introductory language of (b)(6); deleted “The” at the beginning of (b)(6)(A) through (b)(6)(D); and added (b)(7).

The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language of (a)(1), inserted “for distribution in their respective districts” and
“statewide”; redesignated existing provisions of (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A) through (a)(1)(C); deleted “in their respective areas” following “youth groups” in (a)(1)(C); added (a)(1)(D); rewrote (c); and made stylistic changes.

1-4-105. Pronunciation of state name.

Whereas, confusion of practice has arisen in the pronunciation of the name of our state and it is deemed important that the true pronunciation should be determined for use in oral official proceedings.

And, whereas, the matter has been thoroughly investigated by the Historical Society of the State of Arkansas and the Eclectic Society of Little Rock, which have agreed upon the correct pronunciation as derived from history and the early usage of the American immigrants.

Be it therefore resolved by both houses of the General Assembly, that the only true pronunciation of the name of the state, in the opinion of this body, is that received by the French from the native Indians and committed to writing in the French word representing the sound. It should be pronounced in three (3) syllables, with the final “s” silent, the “a” in each syllable with the Italian sound, and the accent on the first and last syllables. The pronunciation with the accent on the second syllable with the sound of “a” in “man” and the sounding of the terminal “s” is an innovation to be discouraged.

History.

Concurrent Resolution No. 4, Acts 1881, p. 216; C. & M. Dig., § 9181a; Pope's Dig., § 11867; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-102.

1-4-106. State nickname.

Because of our unsurpassed scenery, clear lakes, free-flowing streams, magnificent rivers, meandering bayous, delta bottomlands, forested mountains, and abundant fish and wildlife, the official nickname for the State of Arkansas is proclaimed to be “The Natural State”.

History.

House Concurrent Resolution No. 26, Acts 1953, p. 1511; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-110; Acts 1995, No. 1352, § 1.

1-4-107. State motto.

The motto of the State of Arkansas shall be “Regnat Populus”.

History.

Acts 1907, No. 395, § 1, p. 987; C. & M. Dig., § 9181; Pope's Dig., § 11866; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-103.

1-4-108. Official seals.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the Governor to procure a seal for the State of Arkansas, which shall present the following impressions, devices, and emblems, to wit: An eagle at the bottom, holding a scroll in its beak, inscribed “Regnat Populus”, a bundle of arrows in one claw and an olive branch in the other; a shield covering the breast of the eagle, engraved with a steamboat at top, a beehive and plow in the middle, and sheaf of wheat at the bottom; the Goddess of Liberty at the top, holding a wreath in her right hand, a pole in the left hand, surmounted by a liberty cap, and surrounded by a circle of stars outside of which is a circle of rays; the figure of an angel on the left, inscribed “Mercy”, and a sword on the right hand, inscribed “Justice”, surrounded with the words “Seal of the State of Arkansas”.

(b)

The Secretary of State, Auditor of State, and Treasurer of State shall each have a seal of office presenting the impressions, devices, and emblems presented by the Seal of State except that the surrounding words on the Secretary of State's seal shall be “Seal of the Secretary of State, Arkansas”, on the Auditor of State's seal shall be “Seal of the Auditor of State, Arkansas”, and on the Treasurer of State's seal shall be “Seal of the Treasurer of State, Arkansas”.

(c)

All official seals used in the state shall present the same impressions, emblems, and devices presented by the Seal of State, except that the surrounding words shall be such as to indicate the office to which each seal belongs.

History.

Acts 1864, No. 1, §§ 1-3, p. 31; C. & M. Dig., §§ 2096, 9142-9144; Pope's Dig., §§ 2700, 11804-11806; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-104 — 5-106.

Cross References.

Governor to keep seal, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 9.

Seal of state continued, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 25.

1-4-109. State flower.

The apple blossom is declared to be the state floral emblem of Arkansas.

History.

Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 1, Acts 1901, p. 408; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-109.

1-4-110. State insect.

The honeybee is designated as the official state insect for the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-118.

1-4-111. State gem, mineral, and rock.

(a)

The diamond is adopted and designated the official state gem of the State of Arkansas.

(b)

Quartz crystal is adopted and designated the official state mineral of the State of Arkansas.

(c)

Bauxite is adopted and designated the official state rock of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 128, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-115 — 5-117.

1-4-112. State beverage.

Milk is designated as the state beverage of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 998, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-127.

1-4-113. State musical instrument.

The fiddle is designated the official musical instrument of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 277, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-119.

1-4-114. Poet laureate.

(a)

The Governor is authorized to designate or appoint, by proclamation, a Poet Laureate of the State of Arkansas, which shall be an honorary title in recognition of outstanding accomplishments and contributions in poetry by a person who is a resident of the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

The person designated or appointed by the Governor as Poet Laureate of the State of Arkansas shall be a person whose name was selected from a list of names submitted to the Governor upon recommendation of a committee consisting of:

(A)

Two (2) principal heads of English departments of state-supported universities or colleges who are selected by the Director of the Division of Higher Education; and

(B)

Two (2) members of the Poets' Roundtable of Arkansas who are selected by the President of the Poets' Roundtable of Arkansas.

(2)(A)

The person serving as Poet Laureate of the State of Arkansas on August 1, 2017, shall serve until the person's death or resignation from the position.

(B)

The term of a Poet Laureate of the State of Arkansas appointed after August 1, 2017, is four (4) years.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 90, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-111.1; Acts 2017, No. 292, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 1031.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); deleted “the principal heads of the English departments of all state-supported universities and colleges” from the end of the introductory language of (b)(1); and added (b)(1)(A), (b)(1)(B), and (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (b)(1)(A).

1-4-115. State fruit and vegetable.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the South Arkansas Vine Ripe Pink Tomato has a taste, texture, appearance, and aroma second to none and that the tomato is botanically a fruit and used as a vegetable. It is further determined by the General Assembly that Arkansas does not have a state fruit or a state vegetable. Therefore, the South Arkansas Vine Ripe Pink Tomato shall be the official state fruit and the official state vegetable.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 255, § 1.

1-4-116. State songs and anthem.

(a)(1)

The songs “Arkansas (You Run Deep in Me)” and “Oh, Arkansas” shall each be designated and known as the official state song.

(2)

The song “Arkansas”, written in 1916 by Mrs. Eva Ware Barnett, shall be known and designated as Arkansas' official state anthem.

(3)

The song “The Arkansas Traveler”, as composed and approved by the State Song Commission in 1949 as the official state song, is adopted and designated as Arkansas’s official historical song. However, this designation shall not modify or affect the use of any song designated as the official song or anthem of this state if that designation has been appropriately adopted by an act or concurrent resolution of the General Assembly.

(b)

Recognizing that Arkansas has two (2) state songs, one (1) state anthem, and one (1) historical state song, the Secretary of State shall respond to requests for a copy of the Arkansas state song by furnishing copies of “Arkansas”, written by Mrs. Eva Ware Barnett.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 850, § 1; House Concurrent Resolution No. 1003, Acts 1987; House Concurrent Resolution No. 1007, Acts 1987.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, subdivision (a)(1) of the section provided that in order for the songs “Arkansas (You Run Deep in Me)” and “Oh, Arkansas” to be designated as the official state song, the lyricists of the songs must file with the Secretary of State, by May 12, 1987, written consent for the use of each song as the state's official state song. Such consents were timely filed.

1-4-117. Official language.

(a)

The English language shall be the official language of the State of Arkansas.

(b)

This section shall not prohibit the public schools from performing their duty to provide equal educational opportunities to all children.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 40, § 1; 1987, No. 77, § 1.

1-4-118. State bird.

The mockingbird is declared and everywhere recognized as the state bird of the State of Arkansas.

History.

House Concurrent Resolution No. 22, Acts 1929.

1-4-119. State tree.

The pine tree is declared and everywhere recognized as the state tree of the State of Arkansas.

History.

House Concurrent Resolution No. 2, Acts 1939.

1-4-120. State folk dance.

The dance known as the “square dance” is hereby designated and adopted as the American Folk Dance of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 93, § 1.

1-4-121. Purple martin capitals.

(a)

Since the purple martin, a bird known for its appetite for flying insects, is deemed by most as an attractive asset for its appearance, song, cleanliness, and diet — America's Most Wanted Bird, and since the City of Lake Village in Chicot County of southeastern Arkansas is located along the North-South Flyway, the major migration route for millions of birds, the City of Lake Village in Chicot County, shall be designated by the General Assembly to be known as the “Southeast Purple Martin Capital of the State of Arkansas”.

(b)

The City of Fort Smith is hereby designated as the “Northwest Purple Martin Capital of Arkansas”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 469, § 1; 1993, No. 871, § 1.

1-4-122. State mammal.

The white-tailed deer is hereby designated the official mammal of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 892, § 1.

1-4-123. Trout Capital of the U.S.A.

The City of Cotter, Arkansas, shall hereafter be known and may be referred to as the “Trout Capital of the U.S.A.”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 740, § 1.

1-4-124. State soil.

The Stuttgart soil series, member of a soil family of fine, smectitic, thermic albaquultic hapludalfs, is designated and declared as the official Arkansas state soil.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 890, § 1.

1-4-125. State historic cooking vessel.

The Dutch oven is designated as the official historic cooking vessel of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 476, § 1.

1-4-126. State butterfly.

(a)

The Diana fritillary butterfly is designated the official butterfly of the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

This section does not require a state agency or office to republish a publication or brochure in order to list or display the state butterfly.

(2)

A state agency or office may include the information concerning the state butterfly in future publications or brochures or in a scheduled update to a publication or brochure.

(c)

This section does not grant a protected status to the Diana fritillary butterfly.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 156, § 1; 2009, No. 249, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2007, No. 156, § 2, provided: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a state agency or office to republish any publication or brochure in order to list or display the state butterfly. A state agency or office may include the information in future publications or brochures or in any scheduled update to a publication or brochure.”

Acts 2007, No. 156, § 3, provided: “This act shall not grant a protected status to the Diana fritillary butterfly.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b) and (c), and redesignated the remaining text accordingly.

1-4-127. State grain.

(a)

Rice is designated the official grain of the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

This section does not require a state agency or office to republish a publication or brochure in order to list or display the state grain.

(2)

A state agency or office may include the information concerning the state grain in future publications or brochures or in a scheduled update to a publication or brochure.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 513, § 1; 2009, No. 249, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2007, No. 513, § 2, provided: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a state agency or office to republish any publication or brochure in order to list or display the state grain. A state agency or office may include the information in future publications or brochures or in any scheduled update to a publication or brochure.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly.

1-4-128. Lowering of state flags when member of armed services killed in action — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “public building” means a structure occupied by an agency of the State of Arkansas or its political subdivisions.

(b)

The State of Arkansas may honor and pay tribute to a member of the armed services who is killed in action by lowering a state flag located on a public building to half-staff any time after learning of the death of a member of the armed services for a period not to exceed three (3) days.

(c)

This section applies to a member of the armed services who was or has been a resident of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 30, § 1; 2011, No. 1182, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “when a member of the armed services is” for “upon death of a soldier” in the section heading; in (b), substituted “may honor” for “shall honor”, substituted “a state flag located on a public building” for “all state flags located on public buildings”, substituted “any time after learning of the death of a member of the armed services” for “from the time notice of the death of a member of the armed services is received”, and inserted “not to exceed”; and, in (c), deleted “only” following “This section”, inserted “or has been”, and deleted “at the time of his or her death” at the end.

1-4-129. State grape.

(a)

The Cynthiana grape, or Vitis Aestivalis, is designated the official grape of the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

This section does not require a state agency or office to republish a publication or brochure in order to list or display the state grape.

(2)

A state agency or office may include the information concerning the state grape in future publications or brochures or in a scheduled update to a publication or brochure.

(c)

This section does not grant a protected status to the Cynthiana grape.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 547, § 1.

1-4-130. State nut.

(a)

The pecan is designated the official nut of the State of Arkansas.

(b)

This section does not require a state agency or office to republish any publication or brochure in order to list or display the state nut. A state agency or office may include the information concerning the state nut in future publications or brochures or in any scheduled update to a publication or brochure.

(c)

This section does not grant a protected status to the pecan.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 638, § 1.

1-4-131. Artist laureate.

(a)

The Governor may confer by proclamation the honorary title of “Artist Laureate of the State of Arkansas” in recognition of outstanding accomplishments and contributions in art by a person who is a resident of the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

The person designated or appointed by the Governor as Artist Laureate of the State of Arkansas shall be a visual, performing, or literary artist who was nominated by one (1) or more Arkansans.

(2)

The Governor may consult with educational institutions, state agencies, and members of the public to facilitate the selection process.

(c)

The Artist Laureate of the State of Arkansas shall serve a term of four (4) years or until a successor has been appointed for this honorary designation.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 167, § 1.

1-4-132. Poultry Capital of the World.

The City of Springdale, Arkansas, shall hereafter be known and may be referred to as the “Poultry Capital of the World”.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 767, § 1.

1-4-133. Display of national motto.

(a)(1)

If funds under subsection (b) of this section are available, local school superintendents, local building administrators, or chief administrators of the public schools in this state, or institutions of higher education, or their respective designees, and the administrative officials of state agencies, or their respective designees, shall prominently display in a conspicuous place in a location described in subdivision (a)(2) of this section a durable poster or framed copy containing:

(A)(i)

The national motto of the United States, “In God We Trust”.

(ii)

The national motto shall:

(a)

Be easily readable on a poster or framed copy of at least eleven inches by fourteen inches (11" x 14");

(b)

Be the central focus of the poster or framed copy; and

(c)

Be displayed in a large font size;

(B)

An accurate representation of the United States flag, which shall be under the national motto; and

(C)

An accurate representation of the Arkansas state flag or flags.

(2)

The durable posters or framed copies donated or purchased under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be displayed in each:

(A)

Public institution of higher education and elementary and secondary school library and classroom in this state; and

(B)

Public building or facility in this state that is maintained or operated by state funds.

(b)

The copies or posters authorized under this section shall either be donated or shall be purchased solely with funds made available through voluntary contributions to the local school boards, local building governing entity, or the Building Authority Division.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 911, § 1; 2019, No. 604, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6052.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 604 rewrote (a); and inserted “local building governing entity” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” at the end of (b).